Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Law Enforcement Telecommunicator

15.530.
Definitions.

For the purposes of KRS

15.530

to

15.590

:

“CJIS” means the Criminal Justice Information System;

“CJIS-full access course” means a training program of forty (40) hours approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council;

“CJIS telecommunicator” means any full-time public employee, sworn or civilian, whose primary responsibility is to dispatch law enforcement units by means of radio communications for an agency that utilizes the Criminal Justice Information System, and is part of or administered by the state or any political subdivision;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Criminal Justice Training;

“Non-CJIS telecommunicator” means any full-time public employee, sworn or civilian, whose primary responsibility is to dispatch law enforcement units by means of radio communications for an agency that does not utilize the Criminal Justice Information System and is part of or administered by the state or any political subdivision;

“Non-CJIS telecommunicator academy” means a training course of one hundred twenty (120) hours approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council; and

“Telecommunications academy” means a training course of one hundred sixty (160) hours approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 315, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 273, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2003, ch. 52, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2006, ch. 82, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2016 ch. 112, § 5, effective July 15, 2016.

15.540.
Qualifications for law enforcement telecommunicator — Information not subject to disclosure.

An agency hiring a telecommunicator after July 15, 2006, shall certify to the Department of Criminal Justice Training before admission to the telecommunicator training program that the telecommunicator:

Is a citizen of the United States and has reached the age of majority;

Is a high school graduate, regardless of whether the school is accredited or certified by a governing body, provided that the education received met the attendance and curriculum standards of Kentucky law at the time of graduation, as determined by the Kentucky Department of Education; or

Possesses a High School Equivalency Diploma;

Has not been convicted of a felony or other crimes involving moral turpitude as determined by submission of each applicant’s fingerprints to the information systems section of the Department of Kentucky State Police and to the Federal Bureau of Investigation identification division, and by such other investigations as required by the hiring agency;

Has taken a psychological suitability screening administered or approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council to determine his or her suitability to perform the duties of a telecommunicator. Any agency that administers its own suitability screening shall certify the results to the department;

Has taken a polygraph examination administered or approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council to determine his or her suitability to perform the duties of a telecommunicator. Any agency that administers its own polygraph examination shall certify the results to the department; and

Has passed a drug screening administered or approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council. A person shall be deemed to have passed a drug screening if the results are negative for the use of an illegal controlled substance or prescription drug abuse. Any agency that administers its own screening shall certify passing results to the department.

Provisions of the Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

, to the contrary notwithstanding, the applicant’s home address, telephone number, date of birth, Social Security number, and results of any background investigation, psychological suitability screening, and polygraph examination conducted under this section shall not be subject to disclosure.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 315, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 2006, ch. 82, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 30, effective June 26, 2007; 2016 ch. 5, § 3, effective March 18, 2016; 2017 ch. 63, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

15.550.
Law enforcement telecommunicators — Training program.

The basic course offered by the training program shall consist of no less than forty (40) hours of instruction or training and shall consist of subjects appropriate for the basic training of law enforcement telecommunicators in the technique of emergency services communications. The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall approve all training curriculum and instructions.

As a portion of the basic course offered, all telecommunicators who receive or dispatch emergency medical service calls shall be trained in:

Telephone cardiopulmonary resuscitation (T-CPR) utilizing nationally recognized emergency cardiovascular care guidelines. At a minimum this training shall incorporate recognition protocols for out-of-hospital cardiac arrest, compression-only CPR instructions for callers, and continuing education as appropriate; and

Recognizing the symptoms of post-traumatic stress disorder (PTSD). At a minimum, this training shall include guidelines for identifying the symptoms of PTSD and provide a resource guide of available services for treatment.

Online training modules based on nationally recognized guidelines that at a minimum incorporate recognition protocols for out of hospital cardiac arrest and compression-only CPR shall be acceptable for telecommunicators who have not been through the training academies or who are not otherwise certified in these protocols.

The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall incorporate mental health training, with a primary focus on PTSD, into the telecommunicators training program and maintain a current resource list for all telecommunicators and their supervisors about the management and treatment of PTSD and work-induced stress.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 315, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 2016 ch. 112, § 6, effective July 15, 2016; 2018 ch. 65, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 128, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 128, sec. 6, provides that the Act, which amended this statute, may be cited as the Lifeliner’s Act.

15.560.
Certificate of completion of training course required for appointment or retention as law enforcement telecommunicator — Grandfather clause — Annual in-service training course.

No person shall receive an official appointment on a permanent basis as a law enforcement telecommunicator unless the person has previously been awarded a certificate by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council attesting to such person’s satisfactory completion of a non-CJIS telecommunications academy. Every person who is employed after June 24, 2003, as a law enforcement telecommunicator by any law enforcement agency in this state, regardless of prior experience as a non- CJIS telecommunicator, shall forfeit his or her position as such unless, within twelve (12) months from the date of his or her employment, he or she satisfactorily completes the non-CJIS telecommunications academy and is awarded a certificate attesting thereto. The council shall waive the training requirements listed in this section for all law enforcement telecommunicators who are serving on July 15, 2006, and possess a certificate of completion of an approved law enforcement telecommunicator basic training program.

All non-CJIS telecommunicators, whether originally employed before or after July 15, 2006, shall successfully complete each calendar year an in-service training course, appropriate to their job assignment and responsibility, of eight (8) hours’ duration at a school certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council. Each in-service training course shall include a mental health component which highlights post-traumatic stress disorder and work-induced stress, including symptom recognition, treatment, and available resources.

In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of a non-CJIS telecommunicator that prevent completion of training within the time specified, the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee may grant the non-CJIS telecommunicator an extension of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days, in which to complete the training.

A non-CJIS telecommunicator who fails to complete the training within a period of twelve (12) months and any extension of time granted under this section shall be terminated by the employing agency and shall not be permitted to serve as a telecommunicator with any governmental agency in the Commonwealth for a period of one (1) year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 315, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 2003, ch. 52, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2006, ch. 82, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2016 ch. 112, § 7, effective July 15, 2016; 2022 ch. 128, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 128, sec. 6, provides that the Act, which amended this statute, may be cited as the Lifeliner’s Act.

15.565.
Certificate of completion of telecommunications academy required for appointment as CJIS telecommunicator — Completion of CJIS-full access course required for non-CJIS telecommunicator employed as CJIS telecommunicator — Grandfather clause — In-service training courses.

No person shall receive an official appointment on a permanent basis as a CJIS telecommunicator unless that person has previously been awarded a certificate by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council attesting to that person’s satisfactory completion of the CJIS telecommunications academy. Every person who is employed after July 15, 2006, as a CJIS telecommunicator shall forfeit his or her position as such unless, within six (6) months from the date of employment, that person satisfactorily completes the CJIS telecommunications academy and is awarded a certificate attesting thereto. The council shall waive the training requirements listed in this section and award a CJIS telecommunicator certificate for all CJIS telecommunicators who are serving on July 15, 2006, and have successfully completed the CJIS-full access course.

A non-CJIS telecommunicator who gains employment as a CJIS telecommunicator shall successfully complete the CJIS-full access course within six (6) months from the date of his or her employment. A non-CJIS telecommunicator whose employing agency initiates the use of CJIS shall successfully complete the CJIS-full access course within six (6) months from the date that the agency initiates the use of CJIS.

All CJIS telecommunicators, whether originally employed before or after July 15, 2006, shall successfully complete each calendar year an in-service training course, appropriate to their job assignment and responsibility, of eight (8) hours’ duration, of which the number of hours shall not be changed by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, at a school certified or recognized by the council. Each in- service training course shall include a mental health component which highlights post-traumatic stress disorder and work-induced stress, including symptom recognition, treatment, and available resources.

All CJIS telecommunicators, whether originally employed before or after July 15, 2006, shall successfully complete eight (8) hours of CJIS in-service training every two (2) years at a school certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council.

Extensions of time in which to complete the training specified in this section may be granted by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police or the commissioner’s designee.

A CJIS telecommunicator who fails to complete the training within a period of six (6) months and any extension of time granted under this section shall be terminated by the employing agency and shall not be permitted to serve as a telecommunicator with any governmental agency in the Commonwealth for a period of one (1) year.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 52, § 3, effective June 24, 2003; 2006, ch. 82, § 5, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 31, effective June 26, 2007; 2016 ch. 112, § 8, effective July 15, 2016; 2022 ch. 128, § 4, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 128, sec. 6, provides that the Act, which amended this statute, may be cited as the Lifeliner’s Act.

15.570.
Waiver of basic training program upon satisfactory completion of comparable program.

The secretary of justice and public safety shall, with the approval of the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, waive the basic telecommunicator training program and certify applicants who furnish evidence of satisfactory completion of a basic law enforcement telecommunicator training program which, in the council’s opinion, is comparable to that of the training program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 315, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 2007, ch. 85, § 32, effective June 26, 2007.

15.580.
Roster of certified telecommunicators.

The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council and the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall maintain a roster of all certified telecommunicators.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 315, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 2006, ch. 82, § 6, effective July 12, 2006.

15.585.
Reciprocal agreements to provide telephone cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

A PSAP as defined by KRS

65.750

or an agency receiving or dispatching emergency medical service calls may enter into a reciprocal agreement with another PSAP, dedicated phone line, or call center to provide telephone cardiopulmonary resuscitation (T-CPR) utilizing nationally recognized emergency cardiovascular care guidelines, provided that the PSAP or other agency that accepts the call has telecommunicators trained in T-CPR in accordance with KRS 15.550(2) or (3).

Any employee of a PSAP that answers calls for emergency medical conditions shall, in the appropriate circumstances, provide telephonic assistance in administering CPR directly or transfer calls to a dedicated phone line, call center, or other PSAP with which the transferring PSAP has a reciprocal agreement.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 65, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

15.590.
Administrative regulations.

KRS

15.530

to

15.590

shall be administered by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, which shall promulgate administrative regulations as necessary regarding training, in-service training, and telecommunications practices.

The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council may, by administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, explicitly set the exact number at a different number of hours from that established in KRS

15.530

required for completion of the:

Non-CJIS telecommunicators academy; and

Telecommunications academy.

If the council sets an exact number of hours at a different number from that established in KRS

15.530

in an administrative regulation as set out in this subsection, it shall not further change the number of hours without promulgating administrative regulations in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A to set the exact number of hours required for each of the academies.

Nothing in KRS

15.530

to

15.590

shall be interpreted to permit the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council to increase or decrease the eight (8) hours required to be completed by telecommunicators for in-service training as established in KRS 15.560(2) and 15.565(3) and (4).

The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall include mental health training and resources for post-traumatic stress disorder (PTSD) and work-induced stress during each in-service training for all telecommunicators.

At the conclusion of each in-service training, a guideline for recognizing the symptoms of and available treatment resources for PTSD or work-induced stress shall be provided to all supervisors of telecommunicators.

All telecommunicators shall have access to the Law Enforcement Professional Development and Wellness Program established in KRS 15.158.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 315, § 7, effective July 15, 1986; 2000, ch. 480, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 82, § 7, effective July 12, 2006; 2016 ch. 112, § 9, effective July 15, 2016; 2022 ch. 128, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 128, sec. 6, provides that the Act, which amended this statute, may be cited as the Lifeliner’s Act.